Idaho, session 2025, H0307.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 2, Title 34, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 34-221, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
34-221. SECRETARY OF STATE TO INVESTIGATE FALSE CLAIMS AGAINST CANDI-
DATES. (1) Any candidate for office who believes that false information has
been published about him during an election campaign may report such claim
to the secretary of state who shall investigate the claim. If the secretary
of state finds the claim to be verifiably false, he shall give the publish-
ing party seven (7) days to respond to his findings; provided, however, that
if the secretary of state finds a claim to be verifiably false within two (2)
weeks of an election, the publishing party shall have forty-eight (48) hours
to respond. After the secretary of state receives the publishing party's re-
sponse, if any, he shall post his findings on the secretary of state's web-
site by the end of the next business day.
(2) As used in this section, "publish" means to communicate information
to any one (1) or more persons either by telephone, radio, television, inter-
net, or in a writing of any kind.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.